Utah statutes.
49-22-202.   Participation of employers -- Limitations -- Exclusions -- Admission requirements.

(1)  Unless excluded under Subsection (2), an employer is a participating employer and may not withdraw from participation in this system.

(2)  An employer that is a charter school sponsored by the State Board of Education or a school district may be excluded from participation in this system if the charter school makes an election of nonparticipation in accordance with Section 53A-1a-512 unless the charter school makes a one-time, irrevocable retraction of the election of nonparticipation in accordance with Subsection 53A-1a-512(9).

(3) (a)  An employer may, by resolution of its governing body, apply for admission to this system.

(b)  Upon approval of the resolution by the board, the employer is a participating employer in this system and is subject to this title.

(4)  If a participating employer purchases service credit on behalf of regular full-time employees for service rendered prior to the participating employer's admission to this system, the service credit shall be purchased in a nondiscriminatory manner on behalf of all current and former regular full-time employees who were eligible for service credit at the time service was rendered.

